Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1607
Recipients; requirements.

Recipients of grant money shall, upon request, submit to the department records for verification of the information included on applications submitted for grants from the Homeless Shelter Assistance Trust Fund.

Laws 1992, LB 1192, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 516, § 4.